Utah statutes.
78B-6-1227.   Compensation for interest of tenant for life or years.

A person entitled to a tenancy for life or years whose estate has been sold, is entitled to receive a sum as reasonable compensation for the estate.  The person's consent to accept the sum shall be filed in writing with the clerk of the court.  Upon the filing of the consent, the clerk shall enter it in the minutes of the court.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

